Missouri, session 2026, HB3297.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 67, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto two new sections, to be
known as sections 67.5460 and 67.5465, to read as follows:
67.5460. 1. A political subdivision shall authorize multifamily and mixed-use
residential as allowable uses in any area zoned for commercial, industrial, or mixed use
if at least forty percent of the residential units in a proposed multifamily rental
development are, for a period of at least thirty years, affordable as defined in section
215.263. Notwithstanding any other provision of law or local ordinance to the contrary,
no political subdivision shall require a proposed multifamily development to obtain a
zoning or land use change, special exception, conditional use approval, variance, or
comprehensive plan amendment for the building height, zoning, and densities
authorized under this section. For mixed use residential projects, at least sixty-five
percent of the total square footage shall be used for residential purposes.
2. A political subdivision shall not restrict the density of a proposed development
authorized under this section below the highest allowed density on any unincorporated
land in the political subdivision where residential development is allowed.
3. A political subdivision shall not restrict the height of a proposed development
authorized under this subsection below the highest currently allowed height for a
commercial or residential development located in its jurisdiction within one mile of the
proposed development or three stories, whichever is higher.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3297 2
4. A proposed development authorized under this section shall be
administratively approved and no further action by the governing board of the
political subdivision is required if the development satisfies the county's land
development regulations for multifamily developments in areas zoned for such use
and is otherwise consistent with the comprehensive plan, with the exception of
provisions establishing allowable densities, height, and land use. Such land development
regulations include, but are not limited to, regulations relating to setbacks and parking
requirements.
5. A political subdivision shall consider reducing parking requirements for a
proposed development authorized under this section if the development is located within
one-half mile of a public transit system and the public transit system is accessible from
the development. For the purposes of this section, a "public transit system" shall
include buses, commuter rail, other fixed guideways, parking or other facilities, transit
centers, stops, park-n-ride lots, and other transit-related surface transportation.
6. Except as otherwise provided in this section, a development authorized under
this section shall comply with all applicable state and local laws and regulations.
67.5465. 1. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, portions of
property in a multifamily project are considered property used for a charitable purpose
and are eligible to receive an ad valorem property tax exemption if such portions:
(1) Provide affordable housing to natural persons or families meeting the income
limitations provided in subsection 3 of this section;
(2) Are within a newly constructed multifamily project that contains more than
seventy units dedicated to housing natural persons or families meeting the income
limitations provided in subsection 3 of this section; and
(3) Are rented for an amount that does not exceed the amount as specified by the
most recent multifamily rental programs income and rent limit chart posted by the
Multifamily Tax Subsidy Projects Income Limits published by the United States
Department of Housing and Urban Development.
2. If a unit that in the previous year qualified for the exemption under this
section and was occupied by a tenant is vacant on January first, the vacant unit is
eligible for the exemption if the use of the unit is restricted to providing affordable
housing that would otherwise meet the requirements of this section and a reasonable
effort is made to lease the unit to eligible persons or families.
3. (1) Qualified property used to house natural persons or families whose annual
household income is greater than eighty percent but not more than one hundred twenty
percent of the median annual adjusted gross income for households within the
metropolitan statistical area or, if not within a metropolitan statistical area, within the

HB 3297 3
county in which the person or family resides, shall receive an ad valorem property tax
exemption of seventy-five percent of the assessed value.
(2) Qualified property used to house natural persons or families whose annual
household income does not exceed eighty percent of the median annual adjusted gross
income for households within the metropolitan statistical area or, if not within a
metropolitan statistical area, within the county in which the person or family resides, is
exempt from ad valorem property taxes.
4. To receive an exemption under this section, a property owner shall submit an
application on a form prescribed by the department of revenue by March first each
year.
5. The application shall require the property owner to provide, at a minimum,
all of the following:
(1) A list of the units for which the property owner seeks an exemption;
(2) The rent amount received by the property owner for each unit for which the
property owner seeks an exemption. If a unit is vacant and qualifies for an exemption
under subsection 2 of this section, the property owner shall provide evidence of the
published rent amount for each vacant unit; and
(3) A sworn statement, under penalty of perjury, from the property owner
restricting the property for a period of not less than three years to housing persons or
families who meet the income limitations under this section.
6. Any property owned by the taxpayer and situated in this state is subject to the
taxes exempted by the improper exemption, plus a penalty of fifty percent of the unpaid
taxes for each year and interest at a rate of fifteen percent per annum. If an exemption
is improperly granted as a result of a clerical mistake, the property owner improperly
receiving the exemption shall not be assessed a penalty or interest.
7. The provisions of this section shall apply beginning with tax year 2027.
✔